Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7919.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40.1-5 of the General Laws entitled "Mental Health Law" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40.1-5-44. Youth behavioral health family navigation guide.
(a) Establishment. The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals (“the department”) shall develop, publish, and maintain a single, statewide, plain-
language youth behavioral health family navigation guide to assist parents and legal guardians in
understanding how to access and navigate the youth behavioral health system.
(b) Required content. The guide shall, at a minimum, include:
(1) Pre-diagnosis information, including:
(i) Age-appropriate early warning signs and emotional or behavioral indicators;
(ii) General guidance distinguishing developmentally typical behavior from indicators
warranting professional evaluation;
(iii) Support strategies that families may implement while awaiting evaluation or treatment,
including emotional regulation and coping skills;
(iv) Information describing the roles of pediatricians, schools, behavioral health providers,
and other professionals in screening and evaluation; and
(v) Guidance on how to discuss behavioral health concerns with a child in a
developmentally appropriate and supportive manner.

(2) Post-diagnosis information, including:
(i) Descriptions of common levels of care, including inpatient, outpatient, partial
hospitalization, crisis stabilization, and community-based services;
(ii) Pathways for accessing care through private insurance, public insurance, and options
available to uninsured or underinsured youth;
(iii) General information regarding referrals, care coordination, documentation commonly
requested for services, and basic legal rights and protections applicable to youth receiving
behavioral health services; and
(iv) Statewide crisis response contact information.
(3) Crisis framework. The guide shall include a structured framework to assist families in
assessing and responding to behavioral health crises, including:
(i) A description of varying levels of functional impairment;
(ii) Examples of common crisis scenarios and recommended steps;
(iii) General guidance regarding circumstances in which access to care is delayed or denied,
including system-capacity limitations or insurance denials; and
(iv) Regionally specific crisis resources.
(c) Regional resource information. The department may incorporate within the guide
regionally specific behavioral health resource information including, but not limited to, municipal
services, school district programs, designated community behavioral health centers, hospitals, and
nonprofit providers. The structure, organization, and substantive framework of the guide shall
remain uniform and under the sole authority of the department.
(d) Distribution and updates. The department shall:
(1) Publish the guide prominently on its website in a downloadable and printable format;
(2) Update the guide no less than annually;
(3) Make the guide available for distribution to pediatric healthcare providers, public and
private schools, community behavioral health centers, nonprofit behavioral health organizations,
and other appropriate stakeholders; and
(4) Ensure accessibility in accordance with applicable state and federal law.
(e) Nature of guide; limitation of liability. The guide shall be informational in nature and
shall not constitute medical or legal advice. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a
private right of action against the state, the department, or any employee thereof.
(g) Construction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to
services, to alter eligibility requirements established by law, or to expand the regulatory authority
of the department beyond that otherwise provided by law.
LC005812 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005812
========
LC005812 - Page 3 of 4